OL/spell/bg_BG.aff
FLAG long					
SFX	T0	Y	44		
SFX	T0		я	я	.
SFX	T0		я	ешъ	.
SFX	T0		я	е	.
SFX	T0		я	емъ	.
SFX	T0		я	ете	.
SFX	T0		я	ятъ	.
SFX	T0		я	хъ	.
SFX	T0		я	0	.
SFX	T0		я	0	.
SFX	T0		я	хме	.
SFX	T0		я	хте	.
SFX	T0		я	ха	.
SFX	T0		я	ехъ	.
SFX	T0		я	еше	.
SFX	T0		я	еше	.
SFX	T0		я	ехме	.
SFX	T0		я	ехте	.
SFX	T0		я	еха	.
SFX	T0		я	й	.
SFX	T0		я	йте	.
SFX	T0		я	лъ/L5	.
SFX	T0		я	елъ/L2	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	ямъ	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	яшъ	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	я	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	яме	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	яте	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	ятъ	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	яхъ	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	я	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	я	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	яхме	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	яхте	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	яха	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	яхъ	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	яше	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	яше	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	яхме	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	яхте	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	яха	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	яй	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	яйте	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	ялъ/L5	.
SFX	T0		ямъ	ялъ/L2	.
					
SFX	T1	Y	1		
SFX	T1		ямъ	янъ/L4	.
					
SFX	T2	Y	4		
SFX	T2		я	ещъ/L3	.
SFX	T2		я	ейки	.
SFX	T2		ямъ	ящъ/L3	.
SFX	T2		ямъ	яйки	.
					
SFX	U0	Y	88		
SFX	U0		да	да	.
SFX	U0		да	дешъ	.
SFX	U0		да	де	.
SFX	U0		да	демъ	.
SFX	U0		да	дете	.
SFX	U0		да	датъ	.
SFX	U0		да	дохъ	.
SFX	U0		да	дѣ	.
SFX	U0		да	дѣ	.
SFX	U0		да	дохме	.
SFX	U0		да	дохте	.
SFX	U0		да	доха	.
SFX	U0		да	дѣхъ	.
SFX	U0		да	дѣше	.
SFX	U0		да	дѣше	.
SFX	U0		да	дѣхме	.
SFX	U0		да	дѣхте	.
SFX	U0		да	дѣха	.
SFX	U0		да	ди	.
SFX	U0		да	дете	.
SFX	U0		да	лъ/L5	.
SFX	U0		да	дѣлъ/L2	.
SFX	U0		жа	жа	.
SFX	U0		жа	жишъ	.
SFX	U0		жа	жи	.
SFX	U0		жа	жимъ	.
SFX	U0		жа	жите	.
SFX	U0		жа	жатъ	.
SFX	U0		жа	захъ	.
SFX	U0		жа	за	.
SFX	U0		жа	за	.
SFX	U0		жа	захме	.
SFX	U0		жа	захте	.
SFX	U0		жа	заха	.
SFX	U0		жа	жехъ	.
SFX	U0		жа	жеше	.
SFX	U0		жа	жеше	.
SFX	U0		жа	жехме	.
SFX	U0		жа	жехте	.
SFX	U0		жа	жеха	.
SFX	U0		жа	жи	.
SFX	U0		жа	жете	.
SFX	U0		жа	залъ/L5	.
SFX	U0		жа	желъ/L2	.
SFX	U0		та	та	.
SFX	U0		та	тешъ	.
SFX	U0		та	те	.
SFX	U0		та	темъ	.
SFX	U0		та	тете	.
SFX	U0		та	татъ	.
SFX	U0		та	тохъ	.
SFX	U0		та	тѣ	.
SFX	U0		та	тѣ	.
SFX	U0		та	тохме	.
SFX	U0		та	тохте	.
SFX	U0		та	тоха	.
SFX	U0		та	тѣхъ	.
SFX	U0		та	тѣше	.
SFX	U0		та	тѣше	.
SFX	U0		та	тѣхме	.
SFX	U0		та	тѣхте	.
SFX	U0		та	тѣха	.
SFX	U0		та	ти	.
SFX	U0		та	тете	.
SFX	U0		та	лъ/L5	.
SFX	U0		та	тѣлъ/L2	.
SFX	U0		я	я	.
SFX	U0		я	ешъ	.
SFX	U0		я	е	.
SFX	U0		я	емъ	.
SFX	U0		я	ете	.
SFX	U0		я	ятъ	.
SFX	U0		я	хъ	.
SFX	U0		я	0	.
SFX	U0		я	0	.
SFX	U0		я	хме	.
SFX	U0		я	хте	.
SFX	U0		я	ха	.
SFX	U0		я	ехъ	.
SFX	U0		я	еше	.
SFX	U0		я	еше	.
SFX	U0		я	еха	.
SFX	U0		я	ехме	.
SFX	U0		я	еха	.
SFX	U0		я	й	.
SFX	U0		я	йте	.
SFX	U0		я	лъ/L5	.
SFX	U0		я	елъ/L2	.
					
SFX	U1	Y	4		
SFX	U1		да	денъ/L4	.
SFX	U1		жа	занъ/L4	.
SFX	U1		та	тенъ/L4	.
SFX	U1		я	нъ/L4	.
					
SFX	U2	Y	8		
SFX	U2		да	дѣщъ/L3	.
SFX	U2		да	дѣйки	.
SFX	U2		жа	жещъ/L3	.
SFX	U2		жа	жейки	.
SFX	U2		та	тѣщъ/L3	.
SFX	U2		та	тѣйки	.
SFX	U2		я	ещъ/L3	.
SFX	U2		я	ейки	.
					
SFX	U3	Y	23		
SFX	U3		да	да	.
SFX	U3		да	дешъ	.
SFX	U3		да	де	.
SFX	U3		да	демъ	.
SFX	U3		да	дете	.
SFX	U3		да	датъ	.
SFX	U3		да	дохъ	.
SFX	U3		да	дѣ	.
SFX	U3		да	дѣ	.
SFX	U3		да	дохме	.
SFX	U3		да	дохте	.
SFX	U3		да	доха	.
SFX	U3		да	дѣхъ	.
SFX	U3		да	дѣше	.
SFX	U3		да	дѣше	.
SFX	U3		да	дѣхме	.
SFX	U3		да	дѣхте	.
SFX	U3		да	дѣха	.
SFX	U3		да	ди	.
SFX	U3		да	дете	.
SFX	U3		йда	шълъ/L1	.
SFX	U3		да	шълъ/L1	[^й]да
SFX	U3		да	дѣлъ/L2	.
					
SFX	U4	Y	17		
SFX	U4		да	да	.
SFX	U4		да	дешъ	.
SFX	U4		да	де	.
SFX	U4		да	демъ	.
SFX	U4		да	дете	.
SFX	U4		да	датъ	.
SFX	U4		да	дѣхъ	.
SFX	U4		да	дѣше	.
SFX	U4		да	дѣше	.
SFX	U4		да	дѣхме	.
SFX	U4		да	дѣхте	.
SFX	U4		да	дѣха	.
SFX	U4		да	ди	.
SFX	U4		да	дете	.
SFX	U4		да	дѣлъ/L2	.
SFX	U4		да	дѣщъ/L3	.
SFX	U4		да	дѣйки	.
					
SFX	V0	Y	44		
SFX	V0		а	а	.
SFX	V0		а	ишъ	.
SFX	V0		а	и	.
SFX	V0		а	имъ	.
SFX	V0		а	ите	.
SFX	V0		а	атъ	.
SFX	V0		а	ахъ	.
SFX	V0		а	а	.
SFX	V0		а	а	.
SFX	V0		а	ахме	.
SFX	V0		а	ахте	.
SFX	V0		а	аха	.
SFX	V0		а	ехъ	.
SFX	V0		а	еше	.
SFX	V0		а	еше	.
SFX	V0		а	ехме	.
SFX	V0		а	ехте	.
SFX	V0		а	еха	.
SFX	V0		а	и	.
SFX	V0		а	ете	.
SFX	V0		а	алъ/L5	.
SFX	V0		а	елъ/L2	.
SFX	V0		я	я	.
SFX	V0		я	ишъ	.
SFX	V0		я	и	.
SFX	V0		я	имъ	.
SFX	V0		я	ите	.
SFX	V0		я	ятъ	.
SFX	V0		я	ихъ	.
SFX	V0		я	и	.
SFX	V0		я	и	.
SFX	V0		я	ихме	.
SFX	V0		я	ихте	.
SFX	V0		я	иха	.
SFX	V0		я	яхъ	.
SFX	V0		я	еше	.
SFX	V0		я	еше	.
SFX	V0		я	яхме	.
SFX	V0		я	яхте	.
SFX	V0		я	яха	.
SFX	V0		я	й	.
SFX	V0		я	йте	.
SFX	V0		я	илъ/L5	.
SFX	V0		я	ялъ/L2	.
					
SFX	V1	Y	2		
SFX	V1		а	анъ/L4	.
SFX	V1		я	енъ/L4	.
					
SFX	V2	Y	4		
SFX	V2		а	ащъ/L3	.
SFX	V2		а	ейки	.
SFX	V2		я	ящъ/L3	.
SFX	V2		я	ейки	.
					
SFX	V3	Y	44		
SFX	V3		а	а	.
SFX	V3		а	ишъ	.
SFX	V3		а	и	.
SFX	V3		а	имъ	.
SFX	V3		а	ите	.
SFX	V3		а	атъ	.
SFX	V3		а	ихъ	.
SFX	V3		а	и	.
SFX	V3		а	и	.
SFX	V3		а	ихме	.
SFX	V3		а	ихте	.
SFX	V3		а	иха	.
SFX	V3		а	ехъ	.
SFX	V3		а	еше	.
SFX	V3		а	еше	.
SFX	V3		а	ехме	.
SFX	V3		а	ехте	.
SFX	V3		а	еха	.
SFX	V3		а	и	.
SFX	V3		а	ете	.
SFX	V3		а	илъ/L5	.
SFX	V3		а	елъ/L2	.
SFX	V3		я	я	.
SFX	V3		я	ишъ	.
SFX	V3		я	и	.
SFX	V3		я	имъ	.
SFX	V3		я	ите	.
SFX	V3		я	ятъ	.
SFX	V3		я	ихъ	.
SFX	V3		я	и	.
SFX	V3		я	и	.
SFX	V3		я	ихме	.
SFX	V3		я	ихте	.
SFX	V3		я	иха	.
SFX	V3		я	ѣхъ	.
SFX	V3		я	ѣше	.
SFX	V3		я	ѣше	.
SFX	V3		я	ѣхме	.
SFX	V3		я	ѣхте	.
SFX	V3		я	ѣха	.
SFX	V3		я	и	.
SFX	V3		я	ете	.
SFX	V3		я	илъ/L5	.
SFX	V3		я	ѣлъ/L2	.
					
SFX	V4	Y	2		
SFX	V4		а	енъ/L4	.
SFX	V4		я	енъ/L4	.
					
SFX	V5	Y	4		
SFX	V5		а	ещъ/L3	.
SFX	V5		а	ейки	.
SFX	V5		я	ѣщъ/L3	.
SFX	V5		я	ѣйки	.
					
SFX	W0	Y	68		
SFX	W0		ея	ея	.
SFX	W0		ея	еешъ	.
SFX	W0		ея	ее	.
SFX	W0		ея	ей	.
SFX	W0		ея	еемъ	.
SFX	W0		ея	еете	.
SFX	W0		ея	еятъ	.
SFX	W0		ея	ахъ	.
SFX	W0		ея	а	.
SFX	W0		ея	а	.
SFX	W0		ея	ахме	.
SFX	W0		ея	ахте	.
SFX	W0		ея	аха	.
SFX	W0		ея	еехъ	.
SFX	W0		ея	ееше	.
SFX	W0		ея	ееше	.
SFX	W0		ея	еехме	.
SFX	W0		ея	еeхте	.
SFX	W0		ея	ееха	.
SFX	W0		ея	ей	.
SFX	W0		ея	ейте	.
SFX	W0		ея	алъ/L5	.
SFX	W0		ея	еелъ/L2	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣя	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣешъ	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣе	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣй	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣемъ	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣете	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣятъ	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣхъ	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣ	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣ	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣхме	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣхте	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣха	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣехъ	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣеше	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣеше	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣехме	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣeхте	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣеха	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣй	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣйте	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣлъ/L5	.
SFX	W0		ѣя	ѣелъ/L2	.
SFX	W0		жа	жа	.
SFX	W0		жа	жешъ	.
SFX	W0		жа	же	.
SFX	W0		жа	жемъ	.
SFX	W0		жа	жете	.
SFX	W0		жа	жатъ	.
SFX	W0		жа	захъ	.
SFX	W0		жа	за	.
SFX	W0		жа	за	.
SFX	W0		жа	захме	.
SFX	W0		жа	захте	.
SFX	W0		жа	заха	.
SFX	W0		жа	жехъ	.
SFX	W0		жа	жеше	.
SFX	W0		жа	жеше	.
SFX	W0		жа	жехме	.
SFX	W0		жа	жехте	.
SFX	W0		жа	жеха	.
SFX	W0		жа	жи	.
SFX	W0		жа	жете	.
SFX	W0		жа	залъ/L5	.
SFX	W0		жа	желъ/L2	.
					.
SFX	W1	Y	2		
SFX	W1		ея	анъ/L4	.
SFX	W1		ѣя	ѣнъ/L4	.
					.
SFX	W2	Y	2		
SFX	W2		ея	еянъ/L4	.
SFX	W2		ѣя	ѣянъ/L4	.
					.
SFX	W3	Y	2		
SFX	W3		ея	атъ/L4	.
SFX	W3		ѣя	ѣтъ/L4	.
					.
SFX	W4	Y	1		
SFX	W4		жа	занъ/L4	.
					
SFX	W5	Y	6		
SFX	W5		жа	жещъ/L3	.
SFX	W5		жа	жейки	.
SFX	W5		ея	еещъ/L3	.
SFX	W5		ея	еейки	.
SFX	W5		ѣя	ѣещъ/L3	.
SFX	W5		ѣя	ѣейки	.
					
SFX	X0	Y	66		
SFX	X0		а	а	.
SFX	X0		а	ешъ	.
SFX	X0		а	е	.
SFX	X0		а	емъ	.
SFX	X0		а	ете	.
SFX	X0		а	атъ	.
SFX	X0		а	ахъ	.
SFX	X0		а	а	.
SFX	X0		а	а	.
SFX	X0		а	ахме	.
SFX	X0		а	ахте	.
SFX	X0		а	аха	.
SFX	X0		а	ѣхъ	.
SFX	X0		а	ѣше	.
SFX	X0		а	ѣше	.
SFX	X0		а	ѣхме	.
SFX	X0		а	ѣхте	.
SFX	X0		а	ѣха	.
SFX	X0		а	и	.
SFX	X0		а	ете	.
SFX	X0		а	алъ/L5	.
SFX	X0		а	ѣлъ/L2	.
SFX	X0		мъ	мъ	.
SFX	X0		мъ	дешъ	.
SFX	X0		мъ	де	.
SFX	X0		мъ	демъ	.
SFX	X0		мъ	дете	.
SFX	X0		мъ	датъ	.
SFX	X0		мъ	дохъ	.
SFX	X0		мъ	дѣ	.
SFX	X0		мъ	дѣ	.
SFX	X0		мъ	дохме	.
SFX	X0		мъ	дохте	.
SFX	X0		мъ	доха	.
SFX	X0		мъ	дѣхъ	.
SFX	X0		мъ	дѣше	.
SFX	X0		мъ	дѣше	.
SFX	X0		мъ	дѣхме	.
SFX	X0		мъ	дѣхте	.
SFX	X0		мъ	дѣха	.
SFX	X0		мъ	й	.
SFX	X0		мъ	йте	.
SFX	X0		мъ	лъ/L5	.
SFX	X0		мъ	дѣлъ/L2	.
SFX	X0		я	я	.
SFX	X0		я	ешъ	.
SFX	X0		я	е	.
SFX	X0		я	емъ	.
SFX	X0		я	ете	.
SFX	X0		я	ятъ	.
SFX	X0		я	ахъ	.
SFX	X0		я	а	.
SFX	X0		я	а	.
SFX	X0		я	ахме	.
SFX	X0		я	ахте	.
SFX	X0		я	аха	.
SFX	X0		я	ѣхъ	.
SFX	X0		я	ѣше	.
SFX	X0		я	ѣше	.
SFX	X0		я	ѣхме	.
SFX	X0		я	ѣхте	.
SFX	X0		я	ѣха	.
SFX	X0		я	и	.
SFX	X0		я	ете	.
SFX	X0		я	алъ/L5	.
SFX	X0		я	ѣлъ/L2	.
					
